Utah statutes.
58-61-503.   Penalty for unlawful conduct.

An individual who commits any act of unlawful conduct as defined in:

(1)  Subsection 58-61-501(1) or (2) is guilty of a third degree felony; or

(2)  Subsection 58-61-501(3) is guilty of a class A misdemeanor.



Enacted by Chapter 32, 1994 General Session

